New York, session 2025-2026, A10795.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "restriction of anticoagulant pesticide transactions for online and 3 retail stores act" or "RAPTORS act". 4 § 2. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds and declares 5 that it is the policy of this state to ensure that aquatic, terrestrial, 6 and avian wildlife species remain a fully functional component of the 7 ecosystems they inhabit and move through in New York. It is the intent 8 of this act to facilitate this goal by prohibiting the general public 9 from purchasing and utilizing the world's deadliest rodenticides, which, 10 when misapplied or improperly used, can cause significant unintended 11 harm to non-target wildlife and the ecosystem. 12 This legislation also comes in the wake of Flaco's passing. Flaco, the 13 Eurasian eagle-owl whose escape from the Central Park Zoo and life on 14 the loose captivated New York, had been exposed at the time of his death 15 to four of the seven pesticides this bill restricts. The legislature 16 takes this action to protect all non-target species, not only raptors 17 such as eagles, hawks, and owls, but also the thousands of children and 18 pets exposed to anticoagulants that poison control centers receive calls 19 for each year. 20 § 3. Section 33-1301 of the environmental conservation law is amended 21 by adding a new subdivision 14 to read as follows: 22 14. a. Except as provided in paragraph b of this subdivision, no 23 person, business, or entity shall sell, offer for sale, distribute, or 24 use any pesticide containing first-generation anticoagulant rodenticides 25 (FGARs) or second-generation anticoagulant rodenticides (SGARs) within 26 the state. This prohibition applies to all forms of sale, including but EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11733-06-6 A. 10795 2 1 not limited to retail establishments, agricultural suppliers, and online 2 or digital marketplaces serving customers located in the state. 3 b. (1) The prohibitions set forth in paragraph a of this subdivision 4 shall not apply where a public safety risk, a risk to critical infras- 5 tructure, or specific agricultural circumstances exist, as described in 6 paragraph c of this subdivision. 7 (2) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health 8 and the commissioner of agriculture and markets, shall promulgate regu- 9 lations to govern the exceptions pursuant to this paragraph and para- 10 graph c of this subdivision. Such regulations shall require that alter- 11 native pest control methods are exhausted prior to the use of FGARs or 12 SGARs and shall prohibit any application within five hundred feet of a 13 designated wildlife habitat area. 14 c. The prohibitions in paragraph a of this subdivision shall not apply 15 to the use of FGARs or SGARs for an agricultural activity, defined in 16 section three hundred one of the agriculture and markets law, when 17 conducted in any of the following locations: 18 (1) Warehouses used for the storage of foods intended for human or 19 animal consumption; 20 (2) Agricultural food, beverage and condiment processing and 21 production sites; 22 (3) Agricultural production sites housing water storage and conveyance 23 facilities; or 24 (4) Agricultural production sites housing rights-of-way and other 25 transportation infrastructure. 26 d. For the purposes of this subdivision the following terms shall have 27 the following meanings: 28 (1) "First-generation anticoagulant rodenticide" or "FGAR" means any 29 pesticide product containing any of the following active ingredients: 30 (i) Diphacinone. 31 (ii) Warfarin. 32 (iii) Chlorophacinone. 33 (2) "Second-generation anticoagulant rodenticide" or "SGAR" means any 34 pesticide product containing any of the following active ingredients: 35 (i) Brodifacoum. 36 (ii) Bromadiolone. 37 (iii) Difenacoum. 38 (iv) Difethialone. 39 (3) "Wildlife habitat area" means any park, conservation area, wetland 40 buffer zone, nature preserve, or wildlife refuge. 41 (4) "Alternative pest control methods" means non-chemical control 42 measures, including but not limited to habitat modification, exclusion, 43 and sanitation, as well as physical control measures such as snap traps, 44 zap traps, live traps, repellants, owl boxes, and rodent birth control. 45 § 4. This act shall take effect 1 year after it shall have become a 46 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 47 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 48 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 49 effective date.